Missouri, session 2026, SB1278.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 163.048, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 163.048,
to read as follows:
163.048. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Athletics", any interscholastic athletic games,
contests, programs, activities, exhibitions, or other
similar competitions organized and provided for students;
(2) "Sex", the two main categories of male and female
into which individuals are divided based on an individual's
reproductive biology at birth and the individual's genome.
2. (1) The general assembly hereby finds the
following:
(a) A noticeable disparity continues between the
athletics participation rates of students who are male and
students who are female; and
(b) Courts have recognized that classification by sex
is the only feasible classification to promote the
governmental interest of providing opportunities for
athletics for females.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1278 2
(2) The general assembly hereby declares that it is
the public policy of this state to further the governmental
interest of ensuring that sufficient opportunities for
athletics remain available for females to remedy past
discrimination on the basis of sex.
3. (1) Except as provided under subdivision (2) of
this subsection, no private school, public school district,
public charter school, or public or private institution of
postsecondary education shall allow any student to compete
in an athletics competition that is designated for the
biological sex opposite to the student's biological sex as
correctly stated on the student's official birth certificate
as described in subsection [4] 5 of this section or, if the
student's official birth certificate is unobtainable,
another government record.
(2) A private school, public school, public charter
school, or public or private institution of postsecondary
education may allow a female student to compete in an
athletics competition that is designated for male students
if no corresponding athletics competition designated for
female students is offered or available.
4. No private school, public school, public charter
school, public school district, or public or private
institution of postsecondary education shall be a member of,
or remit any funds to, any statewide athletic activities
association or national intercollegiate athletics
organization that allows student athletes to use performance
enhancing drugs.
5. For purposes of this section, a statement of a
student's biological sex on the student's official birth
certificate or another government record shall be deemed to

SB 1278 3
have correctly stated the student's biological sex only if
the statement was:
(1) Entered at or near the time of the student's
birth; or
(2) Modified to correct any scrivener's error in the
student's biological sex.
[5.] 6. A private school, public school district,
public charter school, or public or private institution of
postsecondary education that violates subdivision (1) of
subsection 3 of this section or subsection 4 of this section
shall not receive any state aid under this chapter or
chapter 173 or any other revenues from the state.
[6.] 7. The parent or guardian of any student, or any
student who is over eighteen years of age, who is deprived
of an athletic opportunity as a result of a violation of
this section shall have a cause of action for injunctive or
other equitable relief, as well as payment of reasonable
attorney's fees, costs, and expenses of the parent,
guardian, or student. The relief and remedies set forth
shall not be deemed exclusive and shall be in addition to
any other relief or remedies permitted by law.
[7.] 8. The department of elementary and secondary
education and the department of higher education and
workforce development shall each promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the implementation and
administration of this section. Such rules and regulations
shall ensure compliance with state and federal law regarding
the confidentiality of student medical information. Any
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of

SB 1278 4
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2023, shall be invalid and void.
[8.] 9. The provisions of this section shall expire on
August 28, 2027.
[9.] 10. If any provision of this section or the
application thereof to anyone or to any circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of this section and the application
of such provisions to others or other circumstances shall
not be affected thereby.
✓